California, session 20252026, SB1313.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Every Californian should enjoy the same degree of protection from environmental and health hazards. No single group of people should bear a disproportionate share of the negative environmental consequences and adverse health impacts arising from industrial, governmental, or commercial operations or policies.(2) State law declares that it is the established policy of the state that every human being has the right to safe, clean, affordable, and accessible water adequate for human consumption, cooking, and sanitary purposes.(3) Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) continue to be used in a broad range of industrial processes and in manufacturing products because of their water- and stain-resistant, nonstick, surfactant, and other properties, including for making packaging, plastic food ware, cleaning products, ski waxes, menstrual products, metal products, propellants, coatings and paints, and much more, despite the growing body of evidence that these chemicals may leach into food, water supplies, and even the human body through exposures.(4) Concentrated PFAS contamination in the environment creates cumulative health burdens resulting in communities with greater health risks, such as cancer, reproductive health and fertility effects, and immune system disorders.(5) PFAS makes its way into community water supplies. Water suppliers are not responsible for the introduction of PFAS into the environment, yet these local agencies are responsible for treating our water.(6) Enhancing the long-term sustainability of drinking water systems for all communities increases our communities’ resilience and environmental safety.(7) Funding for the infrastructure to treat PFAS in water supplies, including recycled water, promotes investments for communities, including, but not limited to, small or disadvantaged communities, and important contributions to help those communities create a cleaner environment.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that true environmental justice be brought to our state by addressing PFAS contamination, including the continuing disproportionate environmental burdens in the state and on passive receivers by ensuring that existing funding programs specifically recognize the need for the treatment of PFAS in our water supplies.(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the policies of the state strive to ensure all regions of the state receive an equitable level of consideration for funding, to the extent practicable.SEC. 2. Section 116760.41 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:116760.41. (a) Moneys in the fund and the special accounts may be expended for additional purposes provided in the federal act.(b) (1) In accordance with this chapter, moneys in the fund and special accounts may be considered eligible and expended for projects that address perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in drinking water, consistent with the federal act. water.(2) This subdivision does not expand any obligation of the state to provide resources for the provisions of this chapter.(3) The board may implement this subdivision through its existing process to update its policy handbook, consistent with Section 116760.43. Updating the policy handbook is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.